Arkansas, session 2025, HB1720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Babies at Work Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A parent or guardian who is a public employee has a
responsibility to both his or her job and his or her family; and
(2) The first six (6) months of a child's life poses heightened
demands of a parent or a guardian.
(b) This act is intended to increase public employee retention by
allowing state agencies to permit a parent or guardian who is a public
employee to bring his or her infant to work.

*LGL137*
03/10/2025 11:06:03 AM LGL137

HB1720
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-1-107. Infants at work — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Infant" means a:
(A) Biological child, adopted child, or stepchild under
six (6) months of age of a public employee; and
(B) Foster child under six (6) months of age who has been
placed in the home of a public employee;
(2) "Public employee" means an employee of a state agency; and
(3) "State agency" means any department, agency, board,
commission, office, or other authority of the state.
(b) The head of a state agency may permit a public employee of the
state agency to bring his or her infant to work.
(c) The head of a state agency who permits a public employee to bring
his or her infant to work under this section may establish an internal policy
that includes without limitation:
(1) The identification of an appropriate work environment;
(2) The acceptable work performance standard of the public
employee while his or her infant is at his or her workplace; and
(3) Safety guidelines for an infant who is brought to the
workplace under this section.
(d) The provisions of this section do not prohibit a state agency from
allowing a public employee to bring to the public employee's workplace his or
her:
(1) Biological child, adopted child, or stepchild who is six (6)
months of age or older; or
(2) Foster child six (6) months of age or older who has been
placed in the home of the public employee.







03/10/2025 11:06:03 AM LGL137